Illinois, session 104th, HB4469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Affordable Drug Manufacturing Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Human Services.8    "Generic drug" means a drug that is approved in accordance 9with subdivision (j) of Section 355 of the Federal Food, Drug, 10and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.), or a biosimilar, as 11defined under the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 12262).13    "Partnerships" include, but are not limited to, agreements 14for the procurement of generic prescription drugs by way of 15contracts or purchasing by a payer, State governmental agency, 16group purchasing organization, nonprofit organization, or 17other entity.18    "Pharmacy" or "drugstore" means every store, shop, 19pharmacy department, or any other place where pharmacist care 20is provided by a pharmacist:21        (1) where drugs, medicines, or poisons are dispensed, 22    sold or offered for sale at retail, or displayed for sale 23    at retail; or  HB4469- 2 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1        (2) where prescriptions of physicians, dentists, 2    advanced practice registered nurses, physician assistants, 3    veterinarians, podiatric physicians, or optometrists, 4    within the limits of their licenses, are compounded, 5    filled, or dispensed; or6        (3) which has upon it or displayed within it, or 7    affixed to or used in connection with it, a sign bearing 8    the word or words "Pharmacist", "Druggist", "Pharmacy", 9    "Pharmaceutical Care", "Apothecary", "Drugstore", 10    "Medicine Store", "Prescriptions", "Drugs", "Dispensary", 11    "Medicines", or any word or words of similar or like 12    import, either in the English language or any other 13    language; or14        (4) where the characteristic prescription sign (Rx) or 15    similar design is exhibited.16    "Pharmacy" or "drugstore" includes any store, or shop, or 17other place with respect to which any of the words, objects, 18signs, or designs listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) are 19used in any advertisement.20    "Provider" means a hospital, a skilled nursing facility, a 21comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facility, a home 22health agency, a hospice, a clinic, or a rehabilitation 23agency. 24    "Supplier" means a physician and surgeon or other health 25care practitioner, or an entity that furnishes health care 26services other than a provider.    HB4469- 3 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1    Section 10. Partnership with generic drug manufactures.2    (a) The Department shall enter into partnerships, 3consistent with subsection (b) of Section 15, in consultation 4with other State departments as necessary, to increase 5competition, lower prices, and address shortages in the market 6for generic prescription drugs, to reduce the cost of 7prescription drugs for public and private purchasers, 8taxpayers, and consumers, and to increase patient access to 9affordable drugs.10    (b) Contingent upon specific appropriation, the Department 11shall have the ability to hire staff to oversee and 12project-manage the partnerships for manufacturing or 13distribution of generic prescription drugs. 14    Section 15. Prescription drug acquisition, distribution, 15and price setting.16    (a) The Department shall enter into partnerships resulting 17in the production or distribution of generic prescription 18drugs, with the intent that these drugs be made widely 19available to public and private purchasers, providers and 20suppliers, and pharmacies as appropriate. The generic 21prescription drugs shall be produced or distributed by a drug 22company or generic drug manufacturer that is registered with 23the United States Food and Drug Administration.24    (b)(1) The Department shall only enter into partnerships   HB4469- 4 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1as provided under subsection (a) to produce a generic 2prescription drug at a price that results in savings, targets 3failures in the market for generic drugs, and improves patient 4access to affordable medications.5    (2) For top drugs identified in accordance with the 6criteria listed in paragraph (5), the Department shall, if 7possible, determine partnerships to manufacture or distribute 8generic prescription drugs by examining the relevant legal, 9market, policy, and regulatory factors.10    (3) The Department shall consider the following, if 11applicable, when setting the price of the generic prescription 12drug:13        (A) United States Food and Drug Administration user 14    fees.15        (B) Abbreviated new drug application acquisition costs 16    amortized over a 5-year period.17        (C) Mandatory rebates.18        (D) Total contracting and production costs for the 19    drug, including a reasonable amount for administrative, 20    operating, and rate-of-return expenses of the drug company 21    or generic drug manufacturer.22        (E) Research and development costs attributed to the 23    drug over a 5-year period.24        (F) Other initial start-up costs amortized over a 25    5-year period.26    (4) Each drug shall be made available to providers,   HB4469- 5 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1patients, and purchasers at a transparent price and without 2rebates, other than federally required rebates.3    (5) The Department shall prioritize the selection of 4generic prescription drugs that have the greatest impact on 5lowering drug costs to patients, increasing competition and 6addressing shortages in the prescription drug market, 7improving public health, or reducing the cost of prescription 8drugs to public and private purchasers.9    (c) The top 100 of the most common generic prescription 10drugs as of August 31, 2025, per the National Library of 11Medicine 2025 report, are to be produced and include the 12following: 13        Lisinopril, Levothyroxine, Metformin, Simvastatin, 14    Omeprazole, Amlodipine Besylate, Metoprolol, 15    Acetaminophen (Hydrocodone), Albuterol, 16    Hydrochlorothiazide, Losartan, Gabapentin, Sertraline, 17    Furosemide, Acetaminophen Analgesic, Atenolol, 18    Pravastatin, Amoxicillin, Fluoxetine, Citalopram, 19    Trazodone, Alprazolam, Fluticasone, Bupropion, 20    Carvedilol, Potassium Chloride, Tramadol, Pantoprazole, 21    Montelukast, Escitalopram, Prednisone, Rosuvastatin, 22    Ibuprofen, Meloxicam, Insulin Glargine, 23    Hydrochlorothiazide & Lisinopril, Clonazepam, Aspirin, 24    Clopidogrel Antiplatelet, Glipizide, Warfarin 25    Anticoagulant, Cyclobenzaprine, Insulin Human, 26    Tamsulosin, Zolpidem, Ethinyl Estradiol/ Norgestimate,   HB4469- 6 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1    Duloxetine, Ranitidine, Venlafaxine, Fluticasone 2    Salmeterol, Oxycodone, Azithromycin, Amphetamine, 3    Lorazepam, Allopurinol, Paroxetine, Methylphenidate, 4    Estradiol, Hydrochlorothiazide & Losartan K, Ethinyl 5    Estradiol/ Norethindrone, Fenofibrate, Propanolol, 6    Glimepiride, Ergocalciferol, Esomeprazole, 7    Spironolactone, Loratadine, Naproxen, Lamotrigine, 8    Hydrochlorothiazide/ Triamterene, Cetirizine, 9    Sulfamethoxazole (Trimethoprim), Lovastatin, Diltiazem, 10    Clonidine, Topiramate, Amoxicillin, Pregabalin, Folic 11    Acid, Aldendronate Sodium, Hydrocodone Bitrate, 12    Amitriptyline, Diclofenac, Insulin Aspart, Tiotropium, 13    Quetiapine Fumarate, Enalapril, Polymyxin B Sulfate, 14    Sitagliptin Phosphate, Diazepam, Latanoprost, 15    Ciprofloxacin, Budesonide (Formoterol), Hydroxyzine, 16    Ethinyl Estradiol (Levonorgestrel), Docusate, Valsartan, 17    Finasteride, Ondansetron. 18    The top 100 of the most common generic drugs to be produced 19under this Act shall be updated every 5 years, starting in 202030, per the National Library of Medicine. 21    (d) The Department shall consult with all of the following 22public and private purchasers to assist in developing a list 23of generic prescription drugs to be manufactured or 24distributed through partnerships and to determine the volume 25of each generic prescription drug that can be procured over a 26multiyear period to support a market for a lower cost generic   HB4469- 7 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1prescription drug:2        (1) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 3    the Illinois health insurance marketplace, the Department 4    of Public Health, and the Department of Central Management 5    Services, or the entities acting on behalf of each of 6    those State purchasers.7        (2) Licensed health care service plans.8        (3) Health insurers holding a valid outstanding 9    certificate of authority from the Director of Insurance.10        (4) Hospitals.11        (5) Pharmacy benefit managers.12    (e) Before effectuating a partnership in accordance with 13this Section, the Department shall determine minimum 14thresholds for procurement of an entity's expected volume of a 15targeted drug from the company or manufacturer over a 16multiyear period. In making advance commitments, the 17Department shall consult with the Department of Central 18Management Services. 19    (f) The listed entities in paragraphs (2) through (5) of 20subsection (d) shall not be required to purchase prescription 21drugs from the Department or entities that contract or partner 22with the Department in accordance with this Act.23    (g) The Department shall not be required to consult with 24every entity listed in paragraphs (2) through (5) of 25subsection (d), so long as purchaser engagement includes a 26reasonable representation from these groups.   HB4469- 8 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1    Section 20. Report. 2    (a) On or before July 1, 2028, the Department shall report 3to the General Assembly on the following:4        (1) The feasibility of directly manufacturing generic 5    prescription drugs and selling generic prescription drugs 6    at a fair price.7        (2) An analysis of governance structure options for 8    manufacturing functions, including chartering a private 9    organization, a public-private partnership, or a public 10    board of directors.11        (3) A description of the status of all drugs targeted 12    under this Act.13        (4) An analysis of how the activities of the 14    Department may impact competition, access to targeted 15    drugs, the costs of those drugs, and the costs of generic 16    prescription drugs to public and private purchasers.17        (5) An analysis of viable pathways for partnerships to 18    manufacture or distribute generic prescription drugs by 19    examining the relevant legal, market, policy, and 20    regulatory factors.21    (b) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2029. 22    Section 25. Funding. Implementation of this Act is subject 23to appropriation.   HB4469- 9 -LRB104 15174 KTG 28318 b1    Section 97. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 2its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 3the invalidity of that provision or application does not 4affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 5be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law, except that Section 15 takes effect on January 81, 2029.